Utah statutes.
13-46-302.   Confidentiality of information in the database.

(1)  An accessing agency shall designate who within that accessing agency may access the database.

(2) (a)  A person not designated under Subsection (1) may not use the database.

(b)  An individual designated under Subsection (1) may access the database only for a purpose provided for in Section 13-46-301.

(3)  The database, and the information in the database, is considered a protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, except that an accessing agency may disclose the information to a person who is not a person designated under Subsection (1):

(a)  to the extent necessary to take an administrative action by an accessing agency;

(b)  to the extent necessary to prosecute a criminal act; or

(c)  to the extent that the information is:

(i)  obtainable from a source other than the database; and

(ii)  permitted to be disclosed by a law other than this chapter.

